Washington statutes.
RCW 18.118.040

Applicants for regulation—Written report—Recommendation of department of licensing.

Applicant groups shall submit a written report explaining the factors enumerated in RCW 18.118.030 to the legislative committees of reference. Applicant groups, other than state agencies created prior to July 26, 1987, shall submit copies of their written report to the department of licensing for review and comment. The department of licensing shall make recommendations based on the report to the extent requested by the legislative committees.

[ 1987 c 514 s 7.]